Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.070

Distribution options.

(1) If the member retires, becomes disabled, or otherwise terminates employment, the balance in the member's account may be distributed in accordance with an option selected by the member either as a lump sum or pursuant to other options authorized by the department.

(2) If the member dies while in service, the balance of the member's account may be distributed in accordance with an option selected by the member either as a lump sum or pursuant to other options authorized by the department. The distribution is as follows:

(a) The distribution shall be made to such person or persons as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department;

(b) If there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, the balance of the member's account in the retirement system, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of such account balance pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been nominated by written designation;

(c) If there is no surviving spouse, then to such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department; or

(d) If there is no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal representatives.

(3) If a member has a terminal illness and terminates from employment, the member may choose to have the balance in the member's account distributed as a lump sum payment based on the most recent valuation in order to expedite the distribution. The department shall make this payment within ten working days after receipt of notice of termination of employment, documentation verifying the terminal illness, and an application for payment.

(4) The distribution under subsections (1), (2), or (3) of this section shall be less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 33; 2005 c 327 s 3; 1998 c 117 s 1; 1995 c 239 s 207.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective date—1998 c 117: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 23, 1998]." [ 1998 c 117 s 2.]

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.